Utah, session 2026, HB601.
Section 1. Section 32B-7-102 is amended to read:32B-7-102. Definitions.ReservedAs used in this chapter:(1)"Beer" means a product that:(a)contains:(i)at least .5% of alcohol by volume; and(ii)no more than 5% of alcohol by volume or 4% by weight;(b)is obtained by fermentation, infusion, or decoction of:(i)malt; or(ii)a malt substitute; and(iii)is clearly marketed, labeled, and identified as:(A)beer;(B)ale;(C)porter;(D)stout;(E)lager;(F)a malt;(G)a malted beverage; or(H)seltzer;(c)may contain:(i)hops extract; or(ii)caffeine, if the caffeine is a natural constituent of an added ingredient; and(d)may not contain a propylene glycol-, ethyl alcohol-, or ethanol-based flavoring agent.(2)"Beer" does not include:(a)a flavored malt beverage;(b)a product that contains alcohol derived from:(i)spirituous liquor; or(ii)wine;(c)a product that contains an additive masking or altering a physiological effect of alcohol, including kratom, kava, cannabidiol, or tetrahydrocannabinol; or(d)a beverage described in Subsection (1) that contains one or more flavorings that do not have any bearing on the fermentation, infusion, or decoction of the beverage.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.